Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1592.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3356. Handicapped parking spaces at electric vehicle charging stations.(a) Requirement for parking spaces.--Any person who designs, finances, develops, constructs, installs, leases, operates or maintains an electric vehicle charging station within this Commonwealth for public use shall include at least one parking space large enough to accommodate wheelchair-accessible electric vehicles, including vans and minivans.(b) Report.--The department shall annually post on the department's publicly accessible Internet website activities undertaken under this section, including:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) The total number of electric vehicle charging stations in operation.(2) The locations of all electric vehicle charging stations.(3) Costs to the department in regulating all electric vehicle charging stations.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1592PN1901 - 2 - 1234567